Nebraska, session 109, LB1082.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1082 LB1082
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 86-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-101 Sections 86-101 to 86-166 and sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Telecommunications
Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. Section 86-103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-103 For purposes of the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation
Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in
sections 86-104 to 86-121.01 and section 3 of this act apply.
Sec. 3. North American Numbering Plan has the same meaning as in 47
C.F.R. 52.5, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. A telecommunications company shall have a duty to protect
subscribers and customers of the company from receiving unwanted calls or
text messages from users of unauthenticated North American Numbering Plan
numbers and prevent the fraudulent provision of misleading or inaccurate
caller identification information.
Sec. 5. Original sections 86-101 and 86-103, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-